lt-LT: El. knygų skaitytuvo dalies vieta: Galas; Apačia; Išorė; Priekis; Vidus; Kairėje pusėje; Dešinėje pusėje; Viršus; Kita
nl: Locatie e-reader onderdeel: Rug; Onderkant; Extern; Voorkant; Intern; Linkerkant; Rechterzijde; Bovenkant; Andere
fi: E-kirjanlukijan osan sijainti: Selkä; Alhaalla; Ulkoinen; Etuosa; Sisäinen; Vasen puoli; Oikea puoli; Ylhäällä; Muu
zh-CN: 电子书阅读器部件位置: 背部; 底部; 外部; 前; 内部; 左侧; 右侧; 顶部; 其他
en: E-Book reader part location: Back; Bottom; External; Front; Internal; Left side; Right side; Top; Other
ko: 전자책 리더 부품 위치: 등; 하단; 외부; 앞쪽; 내부; 왼쪽; 오른쪽; 상단; 기타
it: Posizione della parte dell'e-reader: Schiena; Parte inferiore; Esterno; Anteriore; Interno; Lato sinistro; Lato destro; Parte superiore; Altro
pt-PT: Localização da peça do leitor de e-books: Costas; Inferior; Externo; Parte dianteira; Interno; Lado esquerdo; Lado direito; Superior; Outro
ru: Расположение детали для электронной книги: Сзади; Снизу; Внешний; Передняя часть; Внутренний; Левая сторона; Правая сторона; Сверху; Другой
th: ตำแหน่งชิ้นส่วนอีบุ๊ครีดเดอร์: หลัง; ด้านล่าง; ภายนอก; ด้านหน้า; ภายใน; ด้านซ้าย; ด้านขวา; ด้านบน; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Lokacija dela e-bralnika: Zadaj; Spodaj; Zunanja; Spredaj; Notranja; Leva stran; Desna stran; Zgoraj; Drugo
fr: Emplacement de la pièce pour liseuse numérique: Dos; Bas; Externe; Avant; Interne; Côté gauche; Côté droit; Haut; Autre
hr-HR: Lokacija dijela e-čitača: Leđa; Donja strana; Vanjski; Sprijeda; Unutarnji; Lijeva strana; Desna strana; Gornja strana; Ostalo
ro-RO: Locație piesă cititor de cărți electronice: Partea din spate; Jos; Extern; În față; Intern; Stânga; Dreapta; Sus; Altele
pt-BR: Localização da peça do leitor de e-books: Costas; Inferior; Externo; Dianteira; Interno; Lado esquerdo; Lado direito; Superior; Outro
sk-SK: Umiestnenie dielu čítačky e-kníh: Zadný; Spodok; Vonkajší; Predný; Vnútorný; Ľavá strana; Pravá strana; Vrch; Iné
vi: Vị trí bộ phận máy đọc sách điện tử: Lưng; Đáy; Bên ngoài; Trước; Bên trong; Bên trái; Bên phải; Trên cùng; Khác
ja: 電子書籍リーダー部品の場所: 背中; 底面; 外部; フロント; 内部; 左側; 右側; 上面; その他
da: E-bogslæserens delplacering: Ryg; Bund; Ekstern; Front; Indvendig; Venstre side; Højre side; Top; Andet
pl: Lokalizacja części czytnika e-booków: Wstecz; Dół; Zewnętrznay; Przód; Wewnętrzny; Lewa strona; Prawa strona; Góra; Inne
de: E-Book-Reader-Teilestandort: Rücken; Unterseite; Extern; Vorne; Intern; Links; Rechts; Oberseite; Sonstiges
nb: Plassering av e-bokleserdel: Rygg; Bunn; Ekstern; Front; Innvendig; Venstre side; Høyre side; Topp; Annet
tr: E-Kitap okuyucu parça konumu: Sırt; Alt; Harici; Ön taraf; Dahili; Sol taraf; Sağ Taraf; Üst; Diğer
cs: Umístění dílu čtečky elektronických knih: Záda; Spodní; Externí; Předek; Interní; Levá strana; Pravá strana; Horní; Jiné
es: Ubicación de la pieza del lector de libros electrónicos: Espalda; Inferior; Externo; Frontal; Interno; Lado izquierdo; Lado derecho; Superior; Otros
zh-TW: 電子書閱讀器零件位置: 後退; 底部; 外接; 前; 內部; 左側; 右側; 頂部; 其他
el: Θέση εξαρτήματος αναγνώστη ηλεκτρονικών βιβλίων: Πλάτη; Κάτω; Εξωτερικό; Μπροστά; Εσωτερικό; Αριστερή πλευρά; Δεξιά πλευρά; Επάνω; Άλλο
sv: E-bokläsardelens plats: Rygg; Botten; Extern; Front; Inre; Vänster sida; Höger sida; Topp; Övrigt
hu: E-könyv-olvasó alkatrész helye: Háti; Alul; Külső; Elöl; Belső; Bal oldalra; Jobb oldalra; Felül; Egyéb
bg-BG: Местоположение на частта на четеца за електронни книги: Задна; Долна част; Външна; Отпред; Вътрешна; Лява страна; Дясна страна; Горна част; Други